Wyoming statutes. Title 35 Public Health and Safety
Article 12. Inedible Meat Rendering and Processing

§§ 35-7-1201 through 35-7-1211.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2000, ch. 37, § 4.

Cross references. —

For present provisions regulating food industry, see §

35-7-123

et seq.

Editor's notes. —

These sections, which derived from Laws 1969, ch. 153, §§ 1 through 11, constituted the Wyoming Inedible Meat Rendering and Processing Act of 1969.